Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-107
Box Butte.

The county of Box Butte is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southeast corner of township twenty-four, north, range forty-seven, west; thence north to the northeast corner of township twenty-eight, north, range forty-seven, west; thence west to the northwest corner of township twenty-eight, north, range fifty-two, west; thence south to the southwest corner of township twenty-four, north, range fifty-two, west; thence east to the place of beginning.

Formed from Dawes County under Laws 1879, § 10, p. 355, by vote of electors Nov. 2, 1886;

R.S.1913, § 819;

C.S.1922, § 721;

C.S.1929, § 25-108;

R.S.1943, § 22-107.